test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-even-a-circ-CVVC7V-kiela_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfstol
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - kieLâ/kiel7â: # â-stems
    kielâ+N+Sg+Nom: kielâ # kieLâ
    kielâ+N+Sg+Gen: kielâ
    kielâ+N+Sg+Acc: kielâ
    kielâ+N+Sg+Ill: kielân # kieLâ
    kielâ+N+Sg+Loc: kielâst
    kielâ+N+Sg+Com: kieláin
    kielâ+N+Sg+Abe: kielâttáá # kieˊlâttáá
    kielâ+N+Ess:    kiellân
    kielâ+N+Par:    kiellâd
    kielâ+N+Pl+Nom: kielah
    kielâ+N+Pl+Gen: kielâi
    kielâ+N+Pl+Acc: kielâid
    kielâ+N+Pl+Ill: kieláid
    kielâ+N+Pl+Loc: kielâin
    kielâ+N+Pl+Com: kielâiguin # kieˊlâiguin
    kielâ+N+Pl+Abe: kielâittáá # kieˊlâittáá
    
  Noun - njuoLâ/njuol7â: # â-stems
    njuolâ+N+Sg+Nom: njuolâ # njuoLâ
    njuolâ+N+Sg+Gen: njuolâ
    njuolâ+N+Sg+Acc: njuolâ
    njuolâ+N+Sg+Ill: njuolân # njuoLâ
    njuolâ+N+Sg+Loc: njuolâst
    njuolâ+N+Sg+Com: njuoláin
    njuolâ+N+Sg+Abe: njuolâttáá # njuoˊlâttáá
    njuolâ+N+Ess:    njuollân
    njuolâ+N+Par:    njuollâd
    njuolâ+N+Pl+Nom: njuolah
    njuolâ+N+Pl+Gen: njuolâi
    njuolâ+N+Pl+Acc: njuolâid
    njuolâ+N+Pl+Ill: njuoláid
    njuolâ+N+Pl+Loc: njuolâin
    njuolâ+N+Pl+Com: njuolâiguin # njuoˊlâiguin
    njuolâ+N+Pl+Abe: njuolâittáá # njuoˊlâittáá
    
  Noun - mooLâ/mool7â: # â-stems
    moolâ+N+Sg+Nom: moolâ # mooLâ
    moolâ+N+Sg+Gen: moolâ
    moolâ+N+Sg+Acc: moolâ
    moolâ+N+Sg+Ill: moolân # mooLâ
    moolâ+N+Sg+Loc: moolâst
    moolâ+N+Sg+Com: mooláin
    moolâ+N+Sg+Abe: moolâttáá # mooˊlâttáá
    moolâ+N+Ess:    moollân
    moolâ+N+Par:    moollâd
    moolâ+N+Pl+Nom: moolah
    moolâ+N+Pl+Gen: moolâi
    moolâ+N+Pl+Acc: moolâid
    moolâ+N+Pl+Ill: mooláid
    moolâ+N+Pl+Loc: moolâin
    moolâ+N+Pl+Com: moolâiguin # mooˊlâiguin
    moolâ+N+Pl+Abe: moolâittáá # mooˊlâittáá
